Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2404.01
Asset management company, defined.

Asset management company
means a business firm or association that, pursuant to a contractual agreement,
common-law agency agreement, power of attorney, or other legal authorization,
sells, conveys, or otherwise offers an interest in real property that belongs
to a (1) bank, savings and loan association, or other financial institution
created and regulated pursuant to state or federal law, (2) mortgage-holding
entity chartered by Congress, or (3) federal, state, or local governmental
entity.

Laws 2011, LB25, § 2.